Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1
CERTIFICATES OF TITLE

Cross references:

For certificates of title to mobile homes, see the "Titles to Manufactured Homes Act", article 29 of title 38.

42-6-101. Short title.

This part 1 shall be known and may be cited as the "Certificate of Title Act".

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2448, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-6-102. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"All-terrain vehicle" means a three- or four-wheeled vehicle that travels on low-pressure tires with a seat that is straddled by the rider and with handlebars for steering control.

(1.5) "Authorized agent" has the same meaning as set forth in section 42-1-102 (5).

(1.7) "Brand" means a permanent designation or marking on a motor vehicle's title, associated with the vehicle identification number, that conveys information about the value of the vehicle or indicates that the vehicle:

Is a salvage vehicle;

Is rebuilt from salvage;

Is nonrepairable;

Is flood damaged;

Has had its odometer tampered with; or

Has a designation placed on the title by another jurisdiction.

"Dealer" means any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association licensed under the laws of this state to engage in the business of buying, selling, exchanging, or otherwise trading in motor vehicles.

"Department" means the department of revenue acting directly or through a duly authorized officer, agent, or third-party provider.

"Director" means the executive director of the department of revenue.

"Electronic record" means a record generated, created, communicated, received, sent, or stored by electronic means.

Repealed.

(5.5) "Electronic signature" has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-71-101.

"File" means the creation of or addition to an electronic record maintained for a certificate of title by the director or an authorized agent.

(6.1) "Flood damaged" means a motor vehicle was submerged in water to the point that rising water has reached over the doorsill and entered the passenger compartment and damaged electrical, computer, or mechanical components.

(6.3) "Historical military vehicle" means a vehicle of any size or weight that is valued for historical purposes, that was manufactured for use by any nation's armed forces, and that is maintained in a condition that represents its military design and markings.

(6.4) "Junk" means a vehicle that is incapable of operating on roads and is no longer a vehicle because it has been destroyed, dismantled, or changed. These vehicles may not be issued a certificate of title, and any title secured in the purchase of such a vehicle is to be surrendered to the department, which shall cancel the vehicle identification number and remove the vehicle from the motor vehicle system.

(6.5) "Kit vehicle" means a passenger-type motor vehicle assembled, by other than a licensed manufacturer, from a manufactured kit that includes a prefabricated body and chassis and is accompanied by a manufacturer's statement of origin.

"Lien" means a security interest in a motor vehicle under article 9 of title 4, C.R.S., and this article.

"Manufacturer" means a person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association engaged in the manufacture of new motor vehicles, trailers, or semitrailers.

"Mortgage" or "chattel mortgage" means a security agreement as defined in section 4-9-102 (76), C.R.S.

"Motor vehicle" means any self-propelled vehicle that is designed primarily for travel on the public highways and is generally and commonly used to transport persons and property over the public highways, including trailers, semitrailers, and trailer coaches, without motive power. "Motor vehicle" does not include the following:

A low-power scooter or an electric scooter, as both terms are defined in section 42-1-102;

A vehicle that operates only upon rails or tracks laid in place on the ground or that travels through the air or that derives its motive power from overhead electric lines;

A farm tractor, farm trailer, and any other machines and tools used in the production, harvesting, and care of farm products; or

Special mobile machinery or industrial machinery not designed primarily for highway transportation.

"New vehicle" means a motor vehicle being transferred for the first time from a manufacturer or importer, or dealer or agent of a manufacturer or importer, to the end user or customer. A motor vehicle that has been used by a dealer for the purpose of demonstration to prospective customers shall be considered a "new vehicle" unless such demonstration use has been for more than one thousand five hundred miles. Motor vehicles having a gross vehicle weight rating of sixteen thousand pounds or more shall be exempt from this definition.

(11.2) "Nonrepairable" means a motor vehicle that:

Is incapable of safe operation on the road and that has no resale value except as scrap or as a source of parts; or

The owner has designated as scrap or as a source of parts.

(11.3) "Nonrepairable title" means a title document issued by the director or authorized agent to indicate ownership of a nonrepairable vehicle.

(11.5) (a) "Off-highway vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle that is:

Designed to travel on wheels or tracks in contact with the ground;

Designed primarily for use off of the public highways; and

Generally and commonly used to transport persons for recreational purposes.

Except as described in subsection (11.5)(b)(II) of this section, "off-highway vehicle" includes vehicles commonly known as all-terrain vehicles, snowmobiles, and surplus military vehicles but does not include:

Toy vehicles;

Vehicles designed and used primarily for travel on, over, or in the water;

Historical military vehicles;

Golf carts or golf cars;

Vehicles designed and used to carry persons with disabilities;

Vehicles designed and used specifically for agricultural, logging, or mining purposes; or

Motor vehicles.

"Off-highway vehicle" does not include a surplus military vehicle that is owned or leased by a municipality, county, or fire protection district, as defined in section 32-1-103 (7), for the purpose of assisting with firefighting efforts, including mitigating the risk of wildfires.

(11.7) "Off-highway vehicle dealer" means both of the following as defined in section 44-20-402:

A powersports vehicle dealer; and

A used powersports vehicle dealer.

"Owner" means a person or firm in whose name the title to a motor vehicle is registered.

"Person" means natural persons, associations of persons, firms, limited liability companies, partnerships, or corporations.

"Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in a perceivable form.

"Roadworthy" means a condition in which a motor vehicle has sufficient power and is fit to operate on the roads and highways of this state after visual inspection by appropriate law enforcement authorities. In order to be roadworthy, such vehicle, in accord with its design and use, shall have all major parts and systems permanently attached and functioning and shall not be repaired in such a manner as to make the vehicle unsafe. For purposes of this subsection (15), "major parts and systems" shall include, but not be limited to, the body of a motor vehicle with related component parts, engine, transmission, tires, wheels, seats, exhaust, brakes, and all other equipment required by Colorado law for the particular vehicle.

(15.5) (a) "Rolling chassis" means that:

For a motorcycle, the motorcycle has a frame, a motor, front forks, a transmission, and wheels;

For a motor vehicle that is not a motorcycle, the motor vehicle has a frame, a body, a suspension, an axle, a steering mechanism, and wheels.

Nothing in this subsection (15.5) shall be construed to require any listed parts to be operable, in working order, or roadworthy.

"Salvage certificate of title" means a document issued under the authority of the director to indicate ownership of a salvage vehicle.

"Salvage vehicle" means:
(17) (a) (I) "Salvage vehicle" means:

A flood-damaged vehicle;

A vehicle branded as a salvage vehicle by another state; or

A vehicle that is damaged by collision, fire, flood, accident, trespass, or other occurrence, excluding hail damage or theft, to the extent that the vehicle is determined to be a total loss by the insurer or other person acting on behalf of the owner or that the cost of repairing the vehicle to a roadworthy condition and for legal operation on the highways exceeds the vehicle's retail fair market value immediately prior to the damage, as determined by the person who owns the vehicle at the time of the occurrence or by the insurer or other person acting on behalf of the owner.

"Salvage vehicle" does not include an off-highway vehicle.

In assessing whether a vehicle is a "salvage vehicle" under this section, the retail fair market value shall be determined by reference to sources generally accepted within the insurance industry including price guide books, dealer quotations, computerized valuation services, newspaper advertisements, and certified appraisals, taking into account the condition of the vehicle prior to the damage. When assessing the repairs, the assessor shall consider the actual retail cost of the needed parts and the reasonable and customary labor rates for needed labor.

"Salvage vehicle" does not include a vehicle that qualifies as a collector's item, horseless carriage, or street rod vehicle under article 12 of this title at the time of damage.

"Signature" means either a written signature or an electronic signature.

"Electronic signature" has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-71-101.

(18.5) "Snowmobile" means a self-propelled vehicle primarily designed or altered for travel on snow or ice off of the public highways and supported by skis, belts, or cleats. "Snowmobile" does not include machinery used for the grooming of snowmobile trails or ski slopes.

"State" includes the territories and the federal districts of the United States.

"Street rod vehicle" means a vehicle manufactured in 1948 or earlier with a body design that has been modified for safe road use, including, but not limited to, modifications of the drive train, suspension, and brake systems, modifications to the body through the use of materials such as steel or fiberglass, and modifications to any other safety or comfort features.

(20.5) "Surplus military vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle that was:

Purchased for nonmilitary use; and

Built for the United States armed forces.

"Transfer by inheritance" means the transfer of ownership after the death of an owner by means of a will, a written statement, a list as described in section 15-11-513, C.R.S., or upon lawful descent and distribution upon the death intestate of the owner of the vehicle.

"Used vehicle" means a motor vehicle that has been sold, bargained, exchanged, or given away, or has had the title transferred from the person who first took title from the manufacturer or importer, dealer, or agent of the manufacturer or importer, or has been so used as to have become what is commonly known as a secondhand motor vehicle. A motor vehicle that has been used by a dealer for the purpose of demonstration to prospective customers shall be considered a "used vehicle" if such demonstration use has been for more than one thousand five hundred miles.

"Vehicle" means any motor vehicle as defined in subsection (10) of this section.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2448, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(8) and (16) amended, p. 557, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2000:

(4.2), (4.4), (10.5), and (13.5) added, p. 1656, § 1, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 272, § 25, effective November 15.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 565, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(13) amended, p. 932, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 806, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(15.5) added, p. 952, § 2, effective August 7; (6.5) added, p. 1412, § 3, effective July 1, 2007.

L. 2009:

(10) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1285, § 65, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

(10)(d) amended, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1493, § 17, effective October 1.

L. 2013:

(1) and (17)(a) amended and (1.5), (11.5), and (18.5) added, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2378, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 2014:

(17)(c) amended, (HB 14-1299), ch. 136, p. 467, § 1, effective April 25; (1.7), (6.1), (6.4), (11.2), and (11.3) added and (17)(a)(I) amended, (HB 14-1100), ch. 122, p. 432, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2016:

(11.7) added, (SB 16-010), ch. 69, p. 175, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(1.5) and (6) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, pp. 373, 376, §§ 23, 34, effective August 9; (17)(a)(I)(C) amended, (HB 17-1205), ch. 162, p. 600, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(5)(b) repealed and (18) amended, (SB 18-255), ch. 405, p. 2386, § 1, effective August 8; IP(11.7) amended, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 143, § 24, effective October 1; (3) amended, (5)(b) repealed, and (5.5) added, (HB 18-1299), ch. 297, p. 1812, § 7, effective July 1, 2019.

L. 2019:

(10)(a) amended, (HB 19-1221), ch. 271, p. 2565, § 16, effective May 23; (6.3) and (20.5) added and IP(11.5)(b) and (11.5)(b)(III) amended, (SB 19-054), ch. 364, p. 3357, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(11.5)(b) amended, (SB 20-056), ch. 285, p. 1387, § 1, effective July 13.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5)(b) was relocated to § 42-6-109 (4) in 2018 and also to § 42-1-235 in 2019.

42-6-103. Application.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, this part 1 applies to motor vehicles and off-highway vehicles.

This part 1 does not apply to an off-highway vehicle that:

Was first sold or transferred before July 1, 2014, until the off-highway vehicle is sold or transferred to a powersports vehicle dealer after July 1, 2014; or

Is used exclusively for agricultural purposes on private land.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2450, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2379, § 4, effective June 5.

42-6-104. Administration - rules.

The director is charged with the duty of administering this part 1. For that purpose the director is vested with the power to make such reasonable rules and require the use of such forms and procedures as are reasonably necessary for the efficient administration of this part 1.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2450, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 809, § 2, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For rule-making procedures, see article 4 of title 24.

42-6-105. Authorized agents. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2451, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 272, § 26, effective November 15.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 566, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 809, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2017:

Entire section repealed, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 373, § 24, effective August 9.

42-6-106. Certificates of registration - plates.

No certificate of registration or license plates shall be issued for a motor vehicle by the director or an authorized agent except in the following cases:

The applicant exhibits to the director or the authorized agent, or the director or the authorized agent has on file, an official Colorado certificate of title for such vehicle in which it appears that the applicant is the owner of the vehicle sought to be registered and licensed.

The applicant submits satisfactory evidence to the director or the authorized agent that an official Colorado certificate of title to such motor vehicle has been issued or is on file or from which it otherwise appears that the applicant is the owner of the vehicle sought to be registered and licensed. Any evidence submitted to the director or the authorized agent may be maintained in a paper or electronic version.

The applicant applies for an official certificate of title for such motor vehicle pursuant to section 42-6-116.

A member of the armed forces of the United States has purchased a vehicle in a foreign country and registered such vehicle in accordance with the directives of the department of defense of the United States government and is unable to supply proof of ownership in the form customarily required by this state and evidence of ownership is supplied by submitting an executed document prescribed by the secretary of defense concerning the vehicle and authenticated by an officer of the armed forces who has authority to administer oaths under 10 U.S.C. sec. 936.

The vehicle is a commercial vehicle that is registered as part of a fleet based in Colorado and is leased from the owner of such vehicle;

The owner of the commercial vehicle is not a resident of Colorado; and

The applicant applies for apportioned registration pursuant to article 3 of this title and provides the following to the director or authorized agent:

A copy of a current registration or a copy of a current title for such vehicle from a foreign jurisdiction; and

A copy of a lease agreement between the owner and the applicant.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2451, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 1656, § 2, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2002:

(1)(e) added, p. 3, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 809, § 4, effective August 8.

42-6-107. Certificates of title - contents - rules.

The department or authorized agent shall mail or deliver certificates of title to motor or off-highway vehicles issued under this part 1 to the applicant, except as provided in section 42-6-124, and the director shall retain and appropriately index and file information appearing and concerning the issuance of the certificates of title. The certificates may be electronic records in compliance with rules adopted by the director.
(1) (a) (I) The department or authorized agent shall mail or deliver certificates of title to motor or off-highway vehicles issued under this part 1 to the applicant, except as provided in section 42-6-124, and the director shall retain and appropriately index and file information appearing and concerning the issuance of the certificates of title. The certificates may be electronic records in compliance with rules adopted by the director.

In addition to other information that the director may by rule require, the certificates of title must contain the make and model of the motor or off-highway vehicle described in the record, if the information is available, together with the motor and any other serial number of the vehicle, and a description of any other marks or symbols placed upon the vehicle by the vehicle manufacturer for identification purposes.

If a vehicle shows a brand in its title history, or if the vehicle is subject to a brand, the department shall place the appropriate brand on the certificate of title. If the vehicle has multiple brands, the department shall place the most recent brand on the certificate of title and the notice "other brands exist". If the brand is from a certificate of title issued in another jurisdiction, the brand must be carried forward to the Colorado certificate of title along with the name of the jurisdiction originating the brand.

The year listed on the certificate of title of a kit vehicle is the year of manufacture of the kit from which the vehicle was assembled, as indicated in the manufacturer's statement of origin.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(b)(II) of this section, the department may require those vehicle-related entities specified by regulation to verify information concerning a vehicle through the physical inspection of the vehicle. The information required to be verified by a physical inspection must include the vehicle identification number or numbers, the make of vehicle, the vehicle model, the type of vehicle, the year of manufacture of the vehicle, the type of fuel used by the vehicle, and other information as may be required by the department. For the purposes of this subsection (1)(b), "vehicle-related entity" means an authorized agent or designated employee of the agent, a Colorado law enforcement officer, a licensed Colorado dealer, a licensed inspection and readjustment station, or a licensed diesel inspection station.

The department shall not require a physical inspection as a condition for issuance of a certificate of title for a vehicle if:

The applicant for a certificate of title for the vehicle presents either a copy of a manufacturer's certificate of origin or a purchase receipt from the dealer or the out-of-state seller from whom the applicant purchased the vehicle and either document indicates that the applicant purchased the vehicle as new; or

At the time of application, the vehicle is currently titled in another county of the state.

The department or authorized agent shall include in the electronic record of the certificate or the paper version of the certificate a description of every lien on the motor or off-highway vehicle that appears in the application for the certificate of title or is unreleased upon a prior certificate of title for the vehicle, including the date of the lien, the original amount secured by the vehicle, the named lienee, and the county in which the lien appears of record if it is of public record. The department or authorized agent shall number certificates and electronic records consecutively by counties, beginning with number one. The certificate of title filed with the authorized agent is prima facie evidence of the contents of the record and that the person in whose name the certificate is registered is the lawful owner of the vehicle. Except as provided in section 42-6-118, the certificate remains effective after filing until the vehicle described in the record is sold or ownership is otherwise transferred.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2451, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, p. 1657, § 3, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2001:

(1)(b) amended, p. 591, § 4, effective May 30.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 810, § 5, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1412, § 4, effective July 1, 2007.

L. 2013:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2380, § 5, effective June 5.

L. 2014:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 14-1100), ch. 122, p. 433, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 17-1105), ch. 44, p. 129, § 2, effective March 16.

L. 2018:

(1)(b)(I) amended, (SB 18-102), ch. 77, p. 661, § 3, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-102, see section 1 of chapter 77, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

42-6-108. Identification number - title - street rod vehicles. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2452, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1648, § 40, effective June 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 811, § 6, effective August 8.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 249, § 22, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section was relocated to § 42-12-203 in 2011.

42-6-108.5. Rebuilder's certificate of title. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 950, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 249, § 22, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section was relocated to § 42-12-102 in 2011.

42-6-109. Sale or transfer of vehicle - program.

Except as provided in section 42-6-113, a person shall not sell or otherwise transfer a motor or off-highway vehicle to a purchaser or transferee without delivering to the purchaser or transferee a certificate of title to the vehicle duly transferred in the manner prescribed in section 42-6-110. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the certificate of title may be in an electronic format. Except as provided in section 42-6-115, a purchaser or transferee does not acquire any right, title, or interest in and to a motor or off-highway vehicle purchased by the purchaser or transferee unless and until he or she obtains from the transferor the certificate of title duly transferred in accordance with this part 1. A lienholder may request either a paper or electronic version of a certificate of title.

Except as provided in section 42-6-115, a paper copy of a certificate of title is necessary for a transaction in which:

Either party to the transaction is located outside Colorado; or

The purchaser pays for a motor or off-highway vehicle entirely with cash.

Beginning January 1, 2019, the department shall implement a voluntary program for an owner of a motor vehicle to notify the department or an authorized agent after ownership of the motor vehicle is transferred to another person in accordance with subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

A report of ownership transfer is properly filed if the report is made in a manner, which may include by electronic means, approved by the department and received by the department or authorized agent within five business days after the transfer of ownership, and includes the following:

The date and time of sale or transfer;

The full name of the owner of the motor vehicle before the transfer;

The vehicle identification number of the motor vehicle; and

An affidavit, signed under penalty of perjury, that the requirements for the transfer of ownership in subsections (1) and (2) of this section have been satisfied.

The department shall:

Provide or approve one or more methods for reporting the transfer of ownership;

Notify, with the owner's registration renewal information, the owner of a motor vehicle of the option to report the transfer of ownership of a motor vehicle;

Notify the public of the option to report a transfer of ownership of a motor vehicle;

Place instructions on each certificate of title document issued on or after August 8, 2018, for reporting the transfer of ownership of a motor vehicle; and

Forward a copy of the report to each lienholder of record.

If an owner reports a bona fide transfer of ownership of a motor vehicle in accordance with this section, the owner is not liable in or subject to any civil or criminal action brought against the following after the motor vehicle was transferred:

The operator of the motor vehicle, arising from the use of the motor vehicle; and

The motor vehicle.

This subsection (3)(d) does not apply to a civil or criminal action if the action is brought against the owner for the owner's:

Negligence in permitting the purchaser to drive the motor vehicle at the time of sale;

Failure to comply with any law governing the sale of the motor vehicle;

Negligence in selling the motor vehicle;

Material misstatement or omission about the condition of the motor vehicle; or

Failure to make any disclosure required by law.

A report filed under this subsection (3) does not extinguish or impair the rights of any lienholder.

This subsection (3) does not require the owner who transfers a motor vehicle to another person to report the sale to the department in accordance with this subsection (3).

A record covered by this article 6, including a certificate of title, a document necessary to issue a certificate of title, or a signature on the record or document may not be denied legal effect, validity, or enforceability solely because it is in the form of an electronic record, document, or signature. Except as otherwise provided in this article 6, if a rule of law requires a record to be in writing or provides consequences if it is not, an electronic record satisfies that rule of law.

For a record, document, or signature to be legally effective, valid, or enforceable, a person need not obtain a written power of attorney solely because the record, document, or signature is in an electronic form.

This subsection (4) applies to and in a court of law.

This subsection (4) does not require the department to implement a system to electronically accept records, documents, or signatures.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2453, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1658, § 4, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 811, § 7, effective August 8.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (SB 12-095), ch. 112, p. 388, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(1), IP(2), and (2)(b) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2380, § 6, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

(3) added, (SB 18-073), ch. 83, p. 680, § 1, effective August 8; (4) added with relocations, (SB 18-255), ch. 405, p. 2386, § 2, effective August 8.

42-6-110. Certificate of title - transfer - department records - rules.

Upon the sale or transfer of a motor or off-highway vehicle for which a certificate of title has been issued or filed, the person in whose name the certificate of title is registered, if the person is not a dealer, shall execute a formal transfer of the vehicle described in the certificate. The person in whose name the certificate of title is registered or the person's agent or attorney shall affirm the sale or transfer, accompanied by a written declaration that the statement is made under the penalties of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S. The purchaser or transferee, within sixty days thereafter, shall present the certificate, together with an application for a new certificate of title, to the director or one of the authorized agents, accompanied by the fee required in section 42-6-137 to be paid for the filing of a new certificate of title; except that, if no title can be found and the motor vehicle is not roadworthy, the purchaser or transferee may wait until twenty-four months after the motor vehicle was purchased to apply for a certificate of title.

(1.5) (a) If an insurer, as defined in section 10-1-102 (13), C.R.S., or a salvage pool authorized by an insurer is unable to obtain the properly endorsed certificate of ownership or other evidence of ownership acceptable to the department within thirty days following oral or written acceptance by the owner of an offer of settlement of a total loss, that insurer or salvage pool may request, on a form provided by the department and signed under penalty of perjury, the department to issue a salvage or nonrepairable title for the vehicle. The request must include information declaring that the insurer or salvage pool has made at least two written attempts to obtain the certificate of ownership or other acceptable evidence of title and must include the fee for a duplicate title. The form requesting a salvage or nonrepairable title is the only evidence required to obtain a salvage or nonrepairable title.

Upon receiving the fee for a duplicate title and the certificate of ownership, other evidence of title, or a properly executed request described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5), the department shall issue the salvage or nonrepairable title for the vehicle.

(1.7) (a) The department shall allow an insurer, as defined in section 10-1-102 and that is regulated under title 10, an agent of the insurer, a salvage pool that is licensed as a used motor vehicle dealer, a motor vehicle dealer licensed under article 20 of title 44, a used motor vehicle dealer licensed under article 20 of title 44, or any person approved by the department to use the electronic systems created in section 42-4-2103 (3)(c)(III) to access owner and lienholder information of a motor vehicle in the department's records if:

The motor vehicle is the subject of an insurance claim being processed by the insurer;

The motor vehicle is possessed by a salvage pool;

The access is related to a motor vehicle transaction with a motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer; or

The access is authorized by section 24-72-204 (7).

The department shall ensure that the information available to the insurer, the insurer's agent, the salvage pool, a motor vehicle dealer, a used motor vehicle dealer, or a person approved by the department is correct and is limited to the information needed to verify and contact the owner and lienholder of the motor vehicle.

The department may charge the insurer, the insurer's agent, the salvage pool, a motor vehicle dealer, a used motor vehicle dealer, or a person approved by the department a fee in an amount not to exceed the lesser of five dollars or the direct and indirect costs of implementing this subsection (1.7). The department shall deposit the fee in the special purpose account created in section 42-1-211.

The department may promulgate rules establishing standards for verifying:

The identity of the person accessing the records; and

That the access is authorized by section 24-72-204 (7).

In allowing access to the electronic system under this subsection (1.7), the department shall ensure that the addresses of program participants under part 21 of article 30 of title 24 are not released.

A person who violates subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than ten dollars nor more than five hundred dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than ten days nor more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2453, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1658, § 5, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 812, § 8, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-107), ch. 143, p. 606, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2381, § 7, effective June 5.

L. 2014:

(1.5) added, (HB 14-1100), ch. 122, p. 434, § 4, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(1.7) added, (SB 17-251), ch. 309, p. 1671, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

IP(1.7)(a), (1.7)(b), and (1.7)(c) amended, (SB 18-183), ch. 131, p. 856, § 1, effective April 12; (1.7) amended, (HB 18-1299), ch. 297, p. 1812, § 8, effective July 1, 2019.